Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18A State Personnel
18A.043.
Administrative regulations to implement Federal Drug-Free Workplace Act.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, to implement the provisions of the Federal Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988, Subtitle D of Public Law 100-690, so that the Commonwealth of Kentucky can certify that it has met the requirements designed to promote a drug-free workplace for all state employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 483, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

The federal Drug Free Workplace Act of 1988, Subtitle D of Public Law 100-690, was formerly compiled as 41 USCS § 701 et seq. (see now 41 USCS § 8102, et seq.)

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.045.
Creation of Personnel Board — Membership — Prohibited acts.

There is hereby created a Personnel Board in which shall be vested the constitutional powers and responsibilities of officers of the Commonwealth. The board shall consist of seven (7) members, five (5) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor as provided in KRS

18A.050

. Two (2) members of the board shall be elected by classified employees as provided in KRS

18A.0551

.

Personnel Board members shall not accept gifts as provided in KRS 11A.045(1), benefit under any contract or agreement as provided in KRS 11A.040(4), or fail to disclose to other members of the board any direct or indirect conflict of interest as described in KRS 11A.005(2)(c).

Any person retaliating in any manner and any person ordering retaliation against a classified employee or a member of his family because he has participated in an election to the board, either by being a candidate or voting for a candidate, shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 153, § 4, effective April 13, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.050.
Personnel Board — Grandfather clause — Composition — Terms — Automatic termination.

Any person serving on the board on July 15, 1982, shall serve until the expiration of his current term of office. Subsequent appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for which his predecessor was appointed as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration of such term shall be appointed in the same manner as provided in KRS

18A.045

and for the remainder of such term.

Upon the expiration of the terms of office of the two (2) board members whose terms expire January 1, 1984, the Governor shall appoint two (2) members from a list of four (4) names submitted by the Legislative Research Commission. Thereafter, upon the expiration of these terms, such terms shall be filled in the same manner as provided in this subsection.

Upon the expiration of the terms of office, of the members whose terms expire December 31, 1982, January 1, 1985, and January 1, 1986, the Governor shall appoint citizens at large who are not associated with state government in any manner. Thereafter upon the expiration of these terms, such terms shall be filled in the same manner as provided in this subsection.

These five (5) appointments to the board shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. If the Senate is not in session, these five (5) appointments shall be subject to review by the Interim Joint Committee on State Government which shall hold a public hearing and shall transmit its recommendations to the Senate.

The initial election of classified employees to the board shall be held as provided in KRS

18A.0551

. The two (2) classified employees initially elected to the board shall serve until July 1, 1986. Subsequent elections shall be for a term of four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for which his predecessor was elected. If a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of such term, the board shall fill the vacancy as provided in KRS

18A.060

.

If an elected board member accepts an unclassified position with state government, his membership on the board shall be terminated immediately and the vacancy shall be filled as provided in KRS

18A.060

.

If an elected board member accepts a classified position in a cabinet employing another board member or if, through no fault of his own, he is placed in that cabinet, his membership on the board shall not be terminated for the remainder of his term.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 153, § 5, effective April 13, 2010.

Compiler's Notes.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section which direct that the Governor is to make appointments to the Personnel Board solely from lists submitted to him by the Legislative Research Commission were declared invalid in
Legislative Research Comm’n ex rel. Prather v. Brown
, 664 S.W.2d 907 (

Ky. 1984

).

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.055.
Board elections to be held by department — Campaign restrictions. [Repealed.]

18A.0551.
Personnel Board elections — Procedures.

Elections to the board shall be scheduled every four (4) years on or before June 15. The board shall provide written notification of the date of the election to all classified employees on or before April 1; and

Upon receipt of the notification provided for by paragraph (a) of this subsection, an employee wishing to serve on the board shall notify the board, in writing, no later than May 15. This notification shall be notarized and shall include the candidate’s name, address, unique personal identification number, job classification, and length of state employment. It shall also include the name and address of his current employer.

On the last working day of April, the cabinet shall certify a payroll listing to the board that is current on such day and that contains the name, unique personal identification number, and home address of every classified employee.

At least ten (10) working days prior to the election provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall mail to each classified employee whose name appeared on the payroll listing certified by the cabinet at his home address:

A list of candidates for election to the board;

Instructions for voting;

A ballot listing the names of all candidates for election to the board; and

An envelope for returning the ballot should the classified employee wish to return the ballot by first-class mail.

Upon receipt of his ballot, a classified employee wishing to participate in the election provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall:

Vote for no more than two (2) candidates on the ballot, following the instructions for voting;

Print his or her unique personal identification number on the ballot in the space provided on the ballot; and

Deliver the ballot to the board by any means, including first-class mail, facsimile, scanned e-mail, or hand delivery. Ballots shall arrive at the board’s principal address no later than the date of the election or be postmarked on or before the date of the election.

The board shall:

Select an impartial third party to receive, validate, and tabulate all returned ballots as provided by this subsection and subsection (6) of this section; and

Provide the impartial third party with a computer-generated list of the unique personal identification numbers of eligible voters in numerical order.

The impartial third party selected by the board shall collect all ballots from the board and:

Set aside, untabulated, any envelope postmarked with, or ballot stamped as received at the board on, a date subsequent to the deadline provided for by this section;

Verify the unique personal identification number on the ballot by comparing the number to the computer-generated list of unique personal identification numbers of eligible voters provided by the cabinet;

Set aside, untabulated, any ballot containing a unique personal identification number that does not match the unique personal identification number appearing next to the name on the computer-generated list;

Tabulate the timely ballots;

Compare the total tabulated vote with the total number of eligible employees appearing on the computer generated list provided by the cabinet;

Return the ballots; envelopes, including envelopes that have not been opened; and other election material to the board; and

Certify to the board:

That the tabulation does not include two (2) or more ballots with the same unique personal identification number;

The total number of ballots received;

The total number of ballots not included in the tabulation, and the reason each such ballot was not included in the tabulation;

The total number of ballots included in the tabulation; and

The total vote for each candidate.

For at least sixty (60) days after the completion of the tabulation provided for by subsection (6) of this section, the ballots, envelopes, and other election materials provided for by this section shall be public record and open to inspection, but the home addresses and unique personal identification numbers of the eligible employees and voters shall be redacted prior to public inspection or disclosure.

The two (2) candidates receiving the greatest number of votes shall be declared the successful candidates. In the event of a tie vote, the tie shall be broken by a coin toss in the presence of the candidates receiving the tie vote.

Successful candidates shall be notified by the board no later than ten (10) working days after the election. Successful candidates shall take office immediately upon notification.

State employees may use state materials or equipment, except for state-paid first-class postage, to vote in the election of classified employees to the board. Except for voting in accordance with this section, any activity related to the election of a classified employee to the board shall not be conducted during working hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 153, § 6, effective April 13, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.060.
Vacancies of elected board members to be filled by board.

If an elected member of the board vacates his seat for any reason other than the normal expiration of his term, the cabinet shall provide written notification of the vacancy to all classified employees within fifteen (15) days of the vacancy.

Classified employees wishing to fill the vacancy shall notify the cabinet within ten (10) days of the cabinet’s notification of the vacancy.

A majority of the remaining members of the board shall make the appointment to fill the vacancy from the list of those employees who have notified the board under subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 19, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.065.
Oaths, testimony, and production of records.

The board, each member of the board, the executive director and any hearing officer of the board and the secretary shall have the power to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and compel the production of books and papers pertinent to any investigation or hearing authorized by KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

. Any person who shall fail to appear in response to a subpoena or to answer any question or produce any books or papers pertinent to any such investigation or hearing or who shall knowingly give false testimony therein shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.990

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 20, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.280

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 13.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.070.
Personnel board — Organization — Meeting notices required — Records to be public.

The board shall annually elect one (1) of its members chairman and one (1) of its members vice chairman.

The board shall meet at such time and place as shall be specified by call of the chairman. At least one (1) meeting shall be held each month.

All meetings shall be open to the public as provided in KRS

61.805

to

61.850

. Any head of the department or agency employing an elected member of the board or any other person shall not prohibit him from attending meetings of the board, conducting the business of the board, influence or attempt to influence any decision made by that person, discipline the individual for attending the meeting, or take any other action inimical to the interests of the employee or his family. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.990

.

At least seven (7) days in advance of each regular meeting, notice shall be given in writing to each member of the board by the executive director and the executive director shall post a notice in each building owned or leased by the state which houses at least five hundred (500) employees. Four (4) voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall keep records and minutes of its business and official actions.

All records of the board shall be public records and open to public inspection as provided in KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 278, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Except when the Personnel Board is deliberating a decision on a particular case involving an individual, or discussing a matter which is exempt under KRS

61.810

, its meetings are required to be open to the public under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

OAG 83-20

.

When the Personnel Board is deciding a case involving the complaint of an applicant or an employee it is performing a quasi-judicial function and after the evidence is received in open session it may go into closed session to deliberate its decision.

OAG 83-20

.

The Personnel Board may go into closed session at the time of its deliberation of recommended orders submitted by hearing officers and/or Board members, or to deliberate after it has received evidence in an open hearing, by following the procedure set forth in KRS

61.815

. The Personnel Board is authorized to conduct such closed sessions for the purpose of deliberation under KRS 61.810(6) (now KRS 61.810(1)(f)) which exempts from the open meetings requirement discussion or hearings which might lead to the appointment, discipline or dismissal of an individual employee; however, no final action by vote may be taken on such matter in the closed session.

OAG 83-20

.

KRS 18A.095(21) is limited by KRS 18A.070(3) and KRS 18A.070(3) is controlling. OAG 05-OMD-159.

Unless the Personnel Board is deliberating a decision on a particular case involving an individual, within the meaning of KRS 61.810(1)(j), or discussing a matter which is otherwise exempt under one (1) or more of the twelve (12) remaining exceptions, its meetings are required to be open to the public under the provisions of KRS 18A.070(3) and the Open Meetings Act. OAG 05-OMD-159.

18A.075.
Duties of Personnel Board.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, it shall be the duty of the board to:

As provided by this chapter, promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations consistent with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, and with federal standards for the administration of a personnel system in the agencies of the state government receiving federal grants for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

Make investigations, either on petition of a citizen, taxpayer, interested party, or on its own motion, concerning the enforcement and effect of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, and to require observance of its provisions and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A; and to make such investigation as may be requested by the General Assembly or the Governor and to report thereon;

Hear appeals from applicants for positions for which examinations are being or have been conducted, from eligibles on examination registers, from unclassified employees who have been dismissed, demoted, suspended, or reduced in pay or grade for cause, and from officers or employees serving under the personnel systems created by this chapter, as provided by 1986 Acts Ch. 494;

In cooperation with the secretary, promote public understanding of merit principles in government service;

Present, in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 48, budget requests for the support of the personnel board;

Make annual reports to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, and the co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on State Government prior to October 1. The board shall make biennial reports to the General Assembly, which reports shall be a public record freely available to those persons interested in obtaining a copy. The board may request state agencies to provide information to assist the board in compiling the reports, which shall include the following:

The number of merit state employees at the beginning and the end of the reporting period;

The total number of grievances filed and mediation requests made by merit employees during the reporting period;

A tabulation of the stages in which employee complaints were resolved during the reporting period; and

The average amount of time taken to resolve employee complaints during the reporting period, by stage;

Advise the Governor and the secretary with respect to the administration of the personnel system created by this chapter;

Consider and act on such matters as may be referred to the board by the secretary;

Represent the public interest in the improvement of personnel administration in the state service, and advise and assist the secretary in fostering the interest of institutions of learning and of civic, professional, and employee organizations in the improvement of personnel standards in the state service; and

Make a determination, upon receiving notification of proposed classification selection method changes with proper documentation for the necessity for the change from the secretary, on classification selection method changes prior to those changes occurring. Upon receiving a classification selection method change proposal from the secretary, the board shall, at its next regularly scheduled monthly meeting, review and comment on proposed selection method changes. No classification shall have its selection method changed without review and comment from the board.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 153, § 7, effective April 13, 2010.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.170

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 15.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.0751.
Personnel Board — Regulatory authority.

The board shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the classified service governing:

Appeals by state employees;

Demotion;

Dismissal;

Fines, suspensions, and other disciplinary measures;

Probation, provided that the board may not require an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months except as provided in subsection (4)(e) of this section and KRS

18A.005

;

Promotion;

Reinstatement;

Transfer; and

Employee grievances and complaints.

These administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, and shall have the force and effect of law, when approved by the board, after compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A and the procedures adopted thereunder;

Administrative regulations promulgated by the board shall not expand or restrict rights granted to, or duties imposed upon, employees and administrative bodies by the provisions of this chapter; and

No administrative body, other than the personnel board, shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the subject matters specified in this section.

Prior to filing an administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission, the board shall submit the administrative regulation to the secretary for review:

The secretary shall review the administrative regulation proposed by the board not more than twenty (20) days after its submission to him;

Not more than five (5) days after his review, the secretary shall submit his recommendations in writing to the board;

The board shall review the recommendations of the secretary and may revise the proposed administrative regulation as it deems necessary; and

After the board has completed the review provided for in this section, it may file the proposed administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

These administrative regulations shall provide:

For the procedures to be utilized by the board in the conduct of hearings by the board, consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B;

For reduction in rank or grade as provided by this chapter;

For discharge, as provided by this section;

For imposition, as disciplinary measures, of a fine of not more than ten (10) working days’ pay, or for suspension from the service without pay for no longer than thirty (30) working days and, in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.095

, for the manner of notification of the employee of the discipline and his right of appeal;

No probationary period may exceed twelve (12) months, except as provided in KRS

18A.005

. The secretary may recommend an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months for specific job classifications to the board. This recommendation shall take the form of a proposed administrative regulation that shall be submitted to the board for approval. The subject of the administrative regulation shall be limited to job classifications for which an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months is required and shall specify:

The job classification for which an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months is required; and

The specific number of months constituting the initial probationary period for the job classification. No other administrative regulation shall include any provision prescribing an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months, except as provided in KRS

18A.005

. Upon approval by the board of the proposed administrative regulation provided for in this paragraph, the board shall file the regulation with the Legislative Research Commission as provided by KRS Chapter 13A;

For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to the applicant’s qualifications, record of performance, conduct, and seniority. Except as provided by this chapter, vacancies shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the best interest of the service;

For reemployment of laid-off employees in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

For transfer from a position in one (1) department to a similar position in another department involving similar qualifications, duties, responsibilities, and salary ranges as provided by the provisions of KRS 18A.1131(3)(a);

For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and complaints. This plan shall not restrict rights granted employees by the provisions of this chapter;

For promotion of career employees to positions in the unclassified service without loss of status to the individual employees so promoted, as provided by this chapter; and

For any other administrative regulations not inconsistent with this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A as may be proper and necessary for its enforcement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 318, § 20, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 154, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 91, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.080.
Personnel Board — Compensation — Attendance.

Except as provided in KRS

18A.200

, members of the board shall receive compensation of one hundred dollars ($100) per diem for each meeting of the board and reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses in accordance with state regulations and standards applicable to state employees.

In addition to payments for attendance at board meetings all board members may also be paid one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent in the preparation of recommended orders, the review of transcripts or other matters related to appeals before the board.

Any board member missing three (3) consecutive regular meetings shall be deemed to have vacated his office. Replacements to the board shall be made as provided in KRS 18A.050(2) and

18A.060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 91, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.085.
Removal of board members by Governor — Appeal.

Members of the board may be removed by the Governor for cause after being given a copy of charges against them and an opportunity for an administrative hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any member of the board removed by the Governor may appeal the Governor’s final order removing him from the board to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 318, § 21, effective July 15, 1996.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.090.
Personnel Board to hire full-time staff — General counsel may be designated assistant attorney general.

As provided by the budget enacted by the General Assembly and other laws applicable to state personnel, the board shall appoint an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and serve as secretary to the board. He shall have proven administrative and managerial experience and familiarity with equal employment opportunity laws and regulations. The board shall appoint other employees it deems necessary in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The salaries of the executive director and other employees of the board shall be determined by order of the board. The executive director of the board shall prepare the budget request for approval by the board in the form and manner required by applicable law. For the purposes of KRS Chapter 48 the board shall be considered a budget unit.

The board shall appoint a general counsel pursuant to KRS

12.210

to provide legal services for the board. Upon request of the board, the Attorney General may designate the general counsel as an assistant attorney general. The general counsel provided for by this subsection shall not be employed by personal service contract and shall be a full-time employee of the board. The general counsel shall serve as a hearing officer for the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch 111, § 22, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 494, § 15, effective July 15, 1986.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.